Vermont, session 2025-2026, H739.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 6 V.S.A. § 1105d is added to read:
§ 1105d. USE AND SALE OF PARAQUAT; REPORT
(a) Definition. As used in this section, “paraquat” means an herbicide:
(1) known as paraquat, with the chemical name 1,1′-Dimethyl-4,4′-
bipyridinium ion and the Chemical Abstracts Service (CAS) registry
number 4685-14-7;
(2) known as paraquat dichloride, with the chemical name
1,1′-Dimethyl-4,4′-bipyridinium dichloride and the CAS registry number 1910-
42-5;
(3) known as paraquat dimethyl sulfate, with the chemical name 1,1′-
Dimethyl-4,4′-bipyridinium dimethyl sulfate and the CAS registry number
2074-50-2; or
(4) known as paraquat, with the chemical name 1,1′-Dimethyl-4,4′-
bipyridinium ion and all salts thereof.
(b) Prohibition. No person shall sell, use, or apply paraquat except when
authorized by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under subsection
(c) of this section.
(c) Authorized use. The Secretary may issue a written permit for the sale,
use, or application of paraquat within fruit-producing tree orchards or for
VT LEG #390155 v.1

No. 112 Page 2 of 3
2026
growing any crop listed in the U.S. Department of Agriculture Crop Group 13-
07: Berry and Small Fruit Crop Group on or before December 31, 2030. The
Secretary shall ensure that any authorized certified applicator of paraquat has
received all training required by the Environmental Protection Agency and the
Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets not more than one year prior to
receiving a permit for authorized use of paraquat. A written exemption order
under this subsection shall:
(1) be valid for not more than three years or until December 31, 2030,
whichever comes first;
(2) specify the name on the label of the paraquat, uses, and crops or
plants to which the permit applies; the date the permit takes effect; the permit’s
duration; and the permit’s geographic scope, which may include specific
farms, fields, or properties; and
(3) include permit conditions that minimize drift based on drift
mitigation measures identified by the Environmental Protection Agency,
require adherence to label directions to minimize applicator exposure, and
exclusively limit applications to tree rows or vine rows for necessary weed
control.
(d) Reporting. The Secretary shall report annually on all data regarding
any use of paraquat in the State. The report shall include the amount of
paraquat used and the date and location where the paraquat was used. The
Secretary shall submit the report to the House Committee on Agriculture, Food
VT LEG #390155 v.1

No. 112 Page 3 of 3
2026
Resiliency, and Forestry and the Senate Committee on Agriculture on or before
December 15 of each year.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on November 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: May 26, 2026
VT LEG #390155 v.1